Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.aff
FLAG long
SFX aD Y 51
SFX aD voyer voyer/n'q'd'l'm't's' envoyer is:infi
SFX aD voyer voyant/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer is:ppre
SFX aD voyer voyé/q' envoyer is:ppas is:mas
SFX aD voyer voyés/q' envoyer is:ppas is:mas is:pl
SFX aD voyer voyée/q' envoyer is:ppas is:fem
SFX aD voyer voyées/q' envoyer is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX aD voyer voie/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer is:ipre is:1sg
SFX aD voyer voies/n'q'l'm't' envoyer is:ipre is:2sg
SFX aD voyer voie/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer is:ipre is:3sg
SFX aD voyer voyons/n'q'l't' envoyer is:ipre is:1pl
SFX aD voyer voyez/n'q'l'm' envoyer is:ipre is:2pl
SFX aD voyer voient/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer is:ipre is:3pl
SFX aD voyer voyais/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer is:iimp is:1sg
SFX aD voyer voyais/n'q'l'm't' envoyer is:iimp is:2sg
SFX aD voyer voyait/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer is:iimp is:3sg
SFX aD voyer voyions/n'q'l't' envoyer is:iimp is:1pl
SFX aD voyer voyiez/n'q'l'm' envoyer is:iimp is:2pl
SFX aD voyer voyaient/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer is:iimp is:3pl
SFX aD voyer voyai/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX aD voyer voyas/n'q'l'm't' envoyer is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX aD voyer voya/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX aD voyer voyâmes/n'q'l't' envoyer is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX aD voyer voyâtes/n'q'l'm' envoyer is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX aD voyer voyèrent/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX aD voyer verrai/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer is:ifut is:1sg
SFX aD voyer verras/n'q'l'm't' envoyer is:ifut is:2sg
SFX aD voyer verra/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer is:ifut is:3sg
SFX aD voyer verrons/n'q'l't' envoyer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX aD voyer verrez/n'q'l'm' envoyer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX aD voyer verront/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX aD voyer verrais/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer is:cond is:1sg
SFX aD voyer verrais/n'q'l'm't' envoyer is:cond is:2sg
SFX aD voyer verrait/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer is:cond is:3sg
SFX aD voyer verrions/n'q'l't' envoyer is:cond is:1pl
SFX aD voyer verriez/n'q'l'm' envoyer is:cond is:2pl
SFX aD voyer verraient/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer is:cond is:3pl
SFX aD voyer voie/n'j'l'm't' envoyer is:spre is:1sg
SFX aD voyer voies/n'l'm't' envoyer is:spre is:2sg
SFX aD voyer voie/n'l'm't's' envoyer is:spre is:3sg
SFX aD voyer voyions/n'l't' envoyer is:spre is:1pl
SFX aD voyer voyiez/n'l'm' envoyer is:spre is:2pl
SFX aD voyer voient/n'l'm't's' envoyer is:spre is:3pl
SFX aD voyer voyasse/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer is:simp is:1sg
SFX aD voyer voyasses/n'q'l'm't' envoyer is:simp is:2sg
SFX aD voyer voyât/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer is:simp is:3sg
SFX aD voyer voyassions/n'q'l't' envoyer is:simp is:1pl
SFX aD voyer voyassiez/n'q'l'm' envoyer is:simp is:2pl
SFX aD voyer voyassent/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer is:simp is:3pl
SFX aD voyer voie/n'l'm't' envoyer is:impe is:2sg
SFX aD voyer voyons/n'l' envoyer is:impe is:1pl
SFX aD voyer voyez/n'l'm' envoyer is:impe is:2pl
SFX aE Y 6
SFX aE direr direr/n'q'd'l'm't's' direr is:infi
SFX aE direr dirant/n'q'l'm't's' direr is:ppre
SFX aE direr diré/q' direr is:ppas is:mas
SFX aE direr dirés/q' direr is:ppas is:mas is:pl
SFX aE direr dirée/q' direr is:ppas is:fem
SFX aE direr dirées/q' direr is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX aF N 16
SFX aF cerner cerner er is:infi
SFX aF cerner cernant er is:ppre
SFX aF cerner cerné er is:ppas is:mas
SFX aF cerner cernés er is:ppas is:mas is:pl
SFX aF cerner cernée er is:ppas is:fem
SFX aF cerner cernées er is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX aF cerner cerne er is:ipre is:3sg
SFX aF cerner cernent er is:ipre is:3pl
SFX aF cerner cernait er is:iimp is:3sg
SFX aF cerner cernaient er is:iimp is:3pl
SFX aF cerner cerna er is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX aF cerner cernèrent er is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX aF cerner cernera er is:ifut is:3sg
SFX aF cerner cerneront er is:ifut is:3pl
SFX aF cerner cernerait er is:cond is:3sg
SFX aF cerner cerneraient er is:cond is:3pl
SFX aG Y 19
SFX aG er er/n'q'd'm't' er is:infi
SFX aG er ant/n'q'm't' er is:ppre
SFX aG mber mbé mber is:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX aG lter lté lter is:ppas is:mas is:sg
SFX aG lter ltés lter is:ppas is:mas is:pl
SFX aG lter ltée lter is:ppas is:fem is:sg
SFX aG lter ltées lter is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX aG er e/n'q'm't' er is:ipre is:3sg
SFX aG er ent/n'q'm't' er is:ipre is:3pl
SFX aG er ait/n'q'm't' er is:iimp is:3sg
SFX aG er aient/n'q'm't' er is:iimp is:3pl
SFX aG er a/n'q'm't' er is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX aG er èrent/n'q'm't' er is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX aG er ât/n'q'm't' er is:simp is:3sg
SFX aG er assent/n'q'm't' er is:simp is:3pl
SFX aG er era/n'q'm't' er is:ifut is:3sg
SFX aG er eront/n'q'm't' er is:ifut is:3pl
SFX aG er erait/n'q'm't' er is:cond is:3sg
SFX aG er eraient/n'q'm't' er is:cond is:3pl
SFX aH N 47
SFX aH er ant gger is:ppre
SFX aH er é gger is:ppas is:mas
SFX aH er e gger is:ipre is:1sg
SFX aH er es gger is:ipre is:2sg
SFX aH er e gger is:ipre is:3sg
SFX aH er ons gger is:ipre is:1pl
SFX aH er ez gger is:ipre is:2pl
SFX aH er ent gger is:ipre is:3pl
SFX aH er ais gger is:iimp is:1sg
SFX aH er ais gger is:iimp is:2sg
SFX aH er ait gger is:iimp is:3sg
SFX aH er ions gger is:iimp is:1pl
SFX aH er iez gger is:iimp is:2pl
SFX aH er aient gger is:iimp is:3pl
SFX aH er ai gger is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX aH er as gger is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX aH er a gger is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX aH er âmes gger is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX aH er âtes gger is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX aH er èrent gger is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX aH er erai gger is:ifut is:1sg
SFX aH er eras gger is:ifut is:2sg
SFX aH er era gger is:ifut is:3sg
SFX aH er erons gger is:ifut is:1pl
SFX aH er erez gger is:ifut is:2pl
SFX aH er eront gger is:ifut is:3pl
SFX aH er erais gger is:cond is:1sg
SFX aH er erais gger is:cond is:2sg
SFX aH er erait gger is:cond is:3sg
SFX aH er erions gger is:cond is:1pl
SFX aH er eriez gger is:cond is:2pl
SFX aH er eraient gger is:cond is:3pl
SFX aH er e gger is:spre is:1sg
SFX aH er es gger is:spre is:2sg
SFX aH er e gger is:spre is:3sg
SFX aH er ions gger is:spre is:1pl
SFX aH er iez gger is:spre is:2pl
SFX aH er ent gger is:spre is:3pl
SFX aH er asse gger is:simp is:1sg
SFX aH er asses gger is:simp is:2sg
SFX aH er ât gger is:simp is:3sg
SFX aH er assions gger is:simp is:1pl
SFX aH er assiez gger is:simp is:2pl
SFX aH er assent gger is:simp is:3pl
SFX aH er e gger is:impe is:2sg
SFX aH er ons gger is:impe is:1pl
SFX aH er ez gger is:impe is:2pl
