Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.dic
adirer/aE() po:v1t
concerner/aF() po:v1t
envoyer/aD() po:v1tp
incomber/aG() po:v1î
jogger/aH() po:v1i
renvoyer/aD() po:v1tp
résulter/aG() po:v1i
